Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-103
Payment; cancellation and return; duty of state agent.

On receipt of any funds by the state agent, it shall be the duty of such agent to notify the officer from whom received, of the receipt thereof; and immediately on the payment of such bonds or coupons for which funds were remitted, said coupons or bonds shall be canceled and returned to the officer from whom such funds were received.

Laws 1913, c. 15, § 4, p. 79;

R.S.1913, § 368;

C.S.1922, § 285;

C.S.1929, § 11-104;

R.S.1943, § 10-103.